Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4406
Licensed assistant behavior analyst, defined.

Licensed assistant behavior analyst means an individual practicing under the close ongoing supervision of a licensed behavior analyst and who also meets the requirements specified in section 38-4410 and is issued a license as a licensed assistant behavior analyst under the Behavior Analyst Practice Act by the department.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 6.